cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Stavební materiály > Okenní příslušenství: Okenní kliky; Okenní rámy
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Afbouwmaterialen > Raambeslag: Raamslingers; Raamkozijnen
pt-PT: Equipamento > Materiais de construção > Equipamento de janelas: Manivelas de janela; Estruturas de janela
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Statybinės medžiagos > Langų furnitūra: Langų rankenos; Langų rėmai
ko: 철물 > 건축 자재 > 창문 설비: 창문 핸들; 창틀
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Materiali da costruzione > Materiali per finestre: Manovelle per finestre; Telai per finestre
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Baumaterialien > Fensterbauteile: Fensterhebel; Fensterrahmen
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 建材 > 窗户五金: 窗户曲柄; 窗框
hu: Hardver > Építőanyagok > Ablakhardver: Ablakemelők; Ablakkeretek
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > วัสดุก่อสร้าง > อุปกรณ์หน้าต่าง: มือหมุนหน้าต่างบ้าน; กรอบหน้าต่าง
en: Hardware > Building Materials > Window Hardware: Window Cranks; Window Frames
es: Bricolaje > Materiales de construcción > Herrajes para ventanas: Manivelas para ventanas; Marcos de ventanas
hr-HR: Željezarija > Građevinski materijali > Okovi za prozore: Ručice za prozore; Prozorski okviri
fr: Quincaillerie > Matériaux de construction > Équipements pour fenêtres: Manivelles pour fenêtres; Encadrements de fenêtre
ro-RO: Feronerie > Materiale de construcții > Elemente de feronerie pentru ferestre: Manivele pentru ferestre; Cadre fereastră
tr: Hırdavat > Yapı Malzemeleri > Pencere Hırdavatı: Pencere Açma Kolları; Pencere Kasaları
fi: Rakentaminen > Rakennusmateriaalit > Ikkunoiden metalliosat: Ikkunasalvat; Ikkunakarmit
ja: DIY用品 > 建築材料 > 窓用品・取付金具: 回転窓用ハンドル; 窓枠
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Οικοδομικά υλικά > Υλικά παραθύρων: Μανιβέλες παραθύρων; Κουφώματα παραθύρων
vi: Phần cứng > Vật liệu xây dựng > Phụ tùng cửa sổ: Tay quay cửa sổ; Khung cửa sổ
pt-BR: Ferragens > Materiais de construção > Ferragens de janelas: Alavancas para janelas; Batentes de janelas
zh-TW: 硬體 > 建材 > 窗戶五金配件: 窗戶手把; 窗框
bg-BG: Железария > Строителни материали > Обков за прозорци: Дръжки за прозорци тип „манивела“; Рамки за прозорци
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Gradbeni materiali > Okovje za okna: Okenske kljuke; Okenski okvirji
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Строительные изделия > Оконная фурнитура: Ручки для окон; Оконные рамы
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały budowlane > Osprzęt okienny: Korbki i dźwignie do okien; Ramy okienne
nb: Maskinvare > Bygningsmaterialer > Vindusmateriell: Vindushasper; Vindusrammer
sk-SK: Náradie > Stavebné materiály > Okenné kovanie: Kľučky na okná; Okenné rámy
sv: Metallprodukter > Byggnadsmaterial > Metalldelar och -beslag till fönster: Fönstervevar; Fönsterkarmar
da: Isenkram > Byggematerialer > Vinduesdele: Åbningsmekanismer til vinduer; Vindueskarme